ani_numerals.lexd
# -----------NUMERALS-----------

PATTERN Numeral
CardinalNumeral
NumeralCases
OrdinalNumeral
DistributiveNumeral
GroupNumeral
IndefiniteNumeral
MultipleNumeral
FractionNumeral


PATTERN CardinalNumeral
NumRoot[1] [<num>:] Class           # 1
NumStem [<card>:гу]                 # 2-10
NumRoot[10] [<num>:] [<lnk>:лІи]    # -teen
(NumRoot[-10,-1,-4] | (Class NumRoot[4])) [<num>:] [<ten>:цІол] [<card>:гу]     # round number
(NumRoot[-10,-1,-4] | (Class NumRoot[4])) [<num>:] [<ten>:цІол] [<lnk>:ло]      # round +

PATTERN NumStem
(NumRoot[-1,-4] | (Class NumRoot[4])) [<num>:]


LEXICON NumRoot
се[1]       # 1
чІе         # 2 
лъоб        # 3
окъго[4]    # 4
иншду       # 5 
онлІи       # 6 
гьокьу      # 7
бийкьи      # 8
гьочІо      # 9
гьоцІо[10]  # 10


PATTERN NumeralCases
[<num><abs>:се] Class [<pl>:ул]
[<num><obl>:се] ([:ш]|[:лд]) Case[erg]
[<num><obl>:се] ([:щу]|[:л]) Case[-erg]
[<num><obl>:се] ([:ш]|[:л]) Locatives
[<num><obl>:се] ([<pl>:лу]|[<pl>:ли]) (Case|Locatives)

NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<card>:гу] ([:ш]|[:л]) (Case[erg] | Locatives)
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<card>:гу] ([:щу]|[:л]) Case[-erg]
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<card>:гу] ([<pl>:лу]|[<pl>:ли]) (Case | Locatives)


PATTERN OrdinalNumeral
[<num><ord>:лесседусси]
NumStem OrdinalSuffix
NumStem OrdinalSuffix[-ssi] > [<pl>:ул]
NumStem [<ord>:цІулддуссо] [<pl>:л]

NumStem OrdinalSuffix ([:ш]|[:д]) Case[erg]
NumStem OrdinalSuffix [:щу]? Case[-erg]
NumStem OrdinalSuffix [:ш]? Locatives
NumStem ((OrdinalSuffix[-ssi] [<pl>:ул]) | ([<ord>:цІулддуссо] [<pl>:л])) ([:у] | [:и]) (Case | Locatives)

LEXICON OrdinalSuffix
<ord>:ддоб
<ord>:лддоб
<ord>:цІулддусси[ssi]


PATTERN DistributiveNumeral
NumStem NumStem [<card>:гу]
NumStem NumStem [<card>:гу] ([:ш]|[:л]) (Case[erg] | Locatives)
NumStem NumStem [<card>:гу] ([:щу]|[:л]) Case[-erg]
NumStem NumStem [<card>:гу] ([<pl>:лу]|[<pl>:ли]) (Case | Locatives)


PATTERN GroupNumeral
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<group>:лгу]
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<group>:ле] (Case | Locatives) [<card>:гу]

NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<card>:гу] [<group>:ло]
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<card>:гу] [<group>:ло] ([:ш]|[:лд]) Case[erg]
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<card>:гу] [<group>:ло] ([:щу]|[:л]) Case[-erg]
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<card>:гу] [<group>:ло] ([:ш]|[:л]) Locatives

NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<card>:гу] [:л] [<group>:ло] [<pl>:л]
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<card>:гу] [:л] [<group>:ло] ([<pl>:лу]|[<pl>:ли]) (Case|Locatives)


PATTERN IndefiniteNumeral
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]?  
# они должны быть типа три-четыре без гу


PATTERN MultipleNumeral
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<mult>:цІу] [<card>:гу] 


PATTERN FractionNumeral
NumStem [<ten>:цІол]? [<card>:гул] [<frac>:лІикку]
